Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [237.181] SERVICE TO AREAS WITH CARRY VOICE OVER INTERNET PROTOCOL SERVICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Service requirement. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, a telephone company or telecommunications carrier is not required to offer services in an area the Federal Communications Commission has identified through mapping or a successor data program as having telecommunications infrastructure available to carry voice over Internet protocol services. new text end new text begin (b) A telephone company or telecommunications carrier that is not required to offer service in an area pursuant to paragraph (a) must: (1) notify the Public Utilities Commission that the telephone company or telecommunications carrier is not offering service in the area pursuant to paragraph (a); and (2) notify the relevant customers of the process under subdivision 2 to dispute whether the Federal Communications Commission identified the customer's location as having telecommunications infrastructure available to carry voice over Internet protocol services. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Dispute resolution. new text end new text begin (a) The Office of Broadband Development established under section 116J.39 must resolve a dispute over whether a federal data program shows a location as having telecommunications infrastructure available to carry voice over Internet protocol services. new text end new text begin (b) A customer that disputes whether a federal data program shows a location as having telecommunications infrastructure available to carry voice over Internet protocol services must send a letter or email notifying the Office of Broadband Development of the dispute. Within five business days of the date the dispute notice is received, the Office of Broadband Development must notify the relevant telephone company or telecommunications carrier. new text end new text begin (c) The telephone company or telecommunications carrier must respond to the customer's letter or email within five business days of the date the Office of Broadband Development provided notice under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) The state broadband director must resolve the dispute within 15 business days of the date the telephone company or telecommunications carrier responds to the customer's dispute letter or email, or the deadline to respond under paragraph (c), whichever is earlier. The state broadband director must determine whether the Federal Communications Commission identified the area as having telecommunications infrastructure available to carry voice over Internet protocol services. new text end new text begin (e) If the state broadband director determines the Federal Communications Commission identified the area as having telecommunications infrastructure available to carry voice over Internet protocol services, the telephone company or telecommunications carrier is relieved of any obligation to serve the disputed location. This paragraph does not relieve the telephone company or telecommunications carrier from providing services under any applicable federal obligation. new text end new text begin (f) If the state broadband director determines that the Federal Communications Commission identified the location as not having telecommunications infrastructure available to carry voice over Internet protocol services, the telephone company or telecommunications carrier is not relieved of any obligation to serve the disputed location. new text end